incubator/apertium-ga-gv/apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="sca/mh__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfar</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaimid</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaí</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfainn</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaimis</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfá</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhfaidís</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaim</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaimis</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaigí</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaidís</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhamar</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadar</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhtaí</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhainn</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaimis</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhtá</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhadh</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaidís</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhtar</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaim</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaimid</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhann</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhann</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhann</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhann</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mha</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mhaimid</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mha</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mha</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mha</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mha</l>
          <r>mh<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="no/cht__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cht</l>
          <r>cht<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ichte</l>
          <r>cht<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cht</l>
          <r>cht<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chta</l>
          <r>cht<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="docht"><par n="initial-d"/><i>o</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neamhbheacht"><i>neamhbhea</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lomnocht"><i>lomno</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nocht"><i>no</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="promh"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ro</i><par n="sca/mh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beacht"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ea</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="scamh"><i>sca</i><par n="sca/mh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tarnocht"><par n="initial-t"/><i>arno</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fornocht"><par n="initial-f"/><i>orno</i><par n="no/cht__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sclamh"><i>scla</i><par n="sca/mh__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faomh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ao</i><par n="sca/mh__vblex"/></e>
